North Dakota statutes. TITLE 24 Highways, Bridges, And Ferries
CHAPTER 24-01 State Highway System
24-01-26.
Grants of rights of way confirmed.

The following grants of rights of way heretofore made by the legislative assembly are hereby confirmed:

For a highway across the military encampment grounds at Rock Island in Ramsey County as set forth in chapter 134 of the Session Laws of 1901.

For a highway across Devils Lake as set forth in chapter 141 of the Session Laws of 1903.

For a highway across Des Lacs Lake as set forth in chapter 57 of the Session Laws of 1905.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 98; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0126.

Cross-References.

Validation of pre-1929 proceedings for acquisition of right of way, see § 1-06-02.

24-01-27.
Survey — Plat — Damages from survey.

Whenever the director determines by order that public exigency requires the taking of land or materials as provided in section 24-01-18, the director shall cause the same to be surveyed and described, and a plat thereof approved by the county auditor and the said description must be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county wherein the same is located. When such plat has been approved and recorded, any description of the property in accordance with the parcel or lot number and description set forth in such plat must be deemed a good and valid description of the lots or parcels of land so described. No such plat or description may bear the name or number which has been applied to any plat or description previously made and recorded. The director, or the director’s duly authorized agents, may enter upon any land for the purpose of making surveys, examinations, or tests. In case of any damages to said premises, the director forthwith shall pay to the owner of said premises the amount of such damages.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 99; 1957, ch. 189, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0127; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Cross-References.

Irregularities of land to be platted into lots if required, see § 57-02-39.

24-01-28.
Vacating highways by director — Sale of property.

The director may vacate any land or part thereof, or rights in land taken or acquired for highway purposes under the provisions of this title, by executing and recording a deed thereof, and the vacation revests the title to the land or rights in the persons, their heirs, successors, or assigns, in whom it was vested at the time of the taking. As oil, gas, and fluid minerals are not a part of and essential for highway purposes, all such rights heretofore taken, if any, are hereby vacated and returned to the person or persons in whom the title was vested at the time of taking, their heirs, administrators, executors, or assigns. Such reconveyance is subject to any existing contracts or agreements covering the property, and all rights and benefits thereof accrue to the grantee. The governor, on recommendation of the director, may sell and convey on behalf of the state the interests of the state in property acquired by purchase under this title and deemed no longer necessary for the purposes thereof, and the proceeds of the sale so far as practicable must be credited to the funds from which the purchase was made originally. With the consent of the persons, their heirs, successors, or assigns in whom the title or rights to the land were vested at the time of the purchase or acquisition, the director may vacate land acquired by purchase under this title which is deemed no longer necessary for highway purposes and which the director has determined that the cost of the sale exceeds the estimated value of the property, by executing and recording a deed thereof, and the vacation revests the title to the land or rights in those persons, their heirs, successors, or assigns.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 100; 1955, ch. 88, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0128; S.L. 1997, ch. 235, § 1.

Cross-References.

Limit of estates to be taken for highway purposes, see §§ 32-15-03, 32-15-03.2.

Opening and vacating highways, see N.D.C.C. ch. 24-07.

24-01-29.
Temporary acquisition of rights of way or easements for detours.

The director, by order, and as part of the cost of constructing, reconstructing, or repairing a state highway or any part thereof, may acquire by gift, permission, purchase, lease, or condemnation, temporary easements or rights of way for the purpose of providing a temporary detour at such location as the director designates.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 101; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0129.

Cross-References.

Temporary easements for highway construction, maximum duration, see § 47-01-22.

24-01-30.
Authority to establish controlled-access facilities.

The highway authorities of the state, counties, and municipalities of North Dakota, acting alone or in cooperation with each other or with any federal, state, or local agency, or any other state having authority to participate in the construction and maintenance of highways, are hereby authorized to plan, designate, establish, regulate, vacate, alter, improve, maintain, and provide controlled-access facilities for public use wherever such authority or authorities are of the opinion that traffic conditions, present or future, will justify such special facilities, provided that within municipalities such authority is subject to such municipal consent as may be provided by law. Said highway authorities of the state, counties, and municipalities, in addition to the specific powers granted by law, also have and may exercise, relative to controlled-access facilities, any and all additional authority now or hereafter vested in them relative to highways or streets within their respective jurisdictions. Said units may regulate, restrict, or prohibit use of such controlled-access facilities by the various classes of vehicles or traffic in a manner consistent with the definition of a controlled-access facility.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 102; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0130.

24-01-31.
Design of controlled-access facility.

The highway authorities of the state, or any county, or municipality are authorized to so design any controlled-access facility and to so regulate, restrict, or prohibit access as to best serve the traffic for which such facility is intended. In this connection such highway authorities are authorized to divide and separate any controlled-access facility into separate roadways by the construction of raised curbings, central dividing sections, or other physical separations, or by designating such separate roadways by signs, markers, stripes, and the proper lane for such traffic by appropriate signs, markers, stripes, and other devices. No person has any right of ingress or egress to, from or across controlled-access facilities to or from abutting lands, except at such designated points at which access may be permitted, upon such terms and conditions as may be specified from time to time.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 103; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0131.

24-01-32.
Acquisition of property and property rights.

For the purposes of chapter 177 of the 1953 Session Laws, the highway authorities of the state, or any county, or municipality may acquire private or public property and property rights for controlled-access facilities and service roads, including rights of access, air, view, lights, and such advertising rights outside of the right of way as may be determined by the director to be in the public interest, by gift, devise, purchase, or condemnation in the same manner as such units are now or hereafter may be authorized by law to acquire such property or property rights in connection with highways and streets within their respective jurisdictions. All property rights acquired under the provisions of chapter 177 of the 1953 Session Laws must be in fee simple, provided, however, as to any and all lands acquired or taken for highway, road, or street purposes, they may not obtain any rights or interest in or to the oil, gas, or fluid minerals underlying said lands. In connection with the acquisition of property or property rights for any controlled-access facility or portion thereof, or service road in connection therewith, the state, county, or municipal highway authority may, in its discretion, acquire an entire lot, block, or tract of land, if, by so doing, the interests of the public will be best served, even though said entire lot, block, or tract is not immediately needed for the right of way proper.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 104; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0132; S.L. 1959, ch. 229, § 1.

Cross-References.

Interest taken for highway purposes limited to easement, § 32-15-03.2.

24-01-33.
New and existing facilities — Grade crossing elimination.

The highway authorities of the state, or any county, or municipality may designate and establish controlled-access highways as new and additional facilities or may designate and establish an existing street or highway as included within a controlled-access facility. The state or any of its subdivisions has authority to provide for the elimination of intersections at grade of controlled-access facilities with existing state and county roads, and municipal streets, by grade separation or service road, or by closing off such roads and streets at the right-of-way boundary lines of such controlled-access facility; and after the establishment of any controlled-access facility, no highway or street which is not part of said facility may intersect the same at grade. No municipal, county, or state highway, or other public way may be opened into or connected with any such controlled-access facility without the consent and previous approval of the highway authority in the state, county, or municipality having jurisdiction over such controlled-access facility. Such consent and approval may be given only if the public interest is served thereby.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 105; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0133.

24-01-34.
Authority of local units to consent.

The highway authorities of the state, or any county, or municipality are authorized to enter into agreements with each other, or with the federal government, respecting the financing, planning, establishment, improvement, maintenance, use, regulation, or vacation of controlled-access facilities or other public ways in their respective jurisdictions.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 106; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0134.

24-01-35.
Local service roads.

In connection with the development of any controlled-access facility the state, county, or municipal highway authorities are authorized to plan, designate, establish, use, regulate, alter, improve, maintain, and vacate local service roads and streets or to designate as local service roads and streets any existing road or street, and to exercise jurisdiction over service roads in the same manner as is authorized over controlled-access facilities, if, in their opinion, such local service roads and streets are necessary or desirable. Such local service roads or streets must be of appropriate design and must be separated from the controlled-access facility proper by means of all devices designated as necessary or desirable by the proper authority.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 107; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0135.

24-01-36.
Bridges may be built separately.

While the necessary bridges on any state highway must be construed and considered a part of such highway, nevertheless, such bridges may be designed, erected, and contracts awarded separately therefor, and such bridges may be designed, erected, and contracted irrespective of the time when the highway contiguous thereto has been or may have been improved. All necessary fills and approaches to any bridge must be construed and considered as part of such bridge.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 108; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0136.

Cross-References.

Bridges, see N.D.C.C. ch. 24-08.

24-01-37.
Inspection of bridges.

The department, at least every four years, and so far as time and conditions may permit, shall cause an inspection to be made of all bridges on the state highway system in the state. In case any bridge on the state highway system is deemed unsafe for public use by the said department, it forthwith shall take steps to close the same and prevent the use thereof by the public. In case any bridge on the state highway system is deemed unsafe for loads in excess of a certain weight, the department forthwith shall post notices on both ends of such bridge stating that such bridge is unsafe for loads beyond that weight.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 109; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0137; S.L. 1981, ch. 291, § 1.

24-01-38.
Bridge across Yellowstone River in McKenzie County. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 212, § 1.

24-01-39.
Use of right of way for utilities subject to regulations by department.

Electric transmission, telephone or telegraph lines, pole lines, railways, ditches, sewers, water, heat, or pipelines, gas mains, flumes, or other structures outside of the limits of any municipality which under the laws of this state, may be constructed, placed, or maintained across or along any highway which is a part of the state highway system, by any person, persons, corporation, limited liability company, or subdivision of the state, may be so maintained or constructed only in accordance with such regulations as may be prescribed by the department, which has power to prescribe and enforce reasonable rules and regulations with reference to the placing and maintaining along, across, or on any such state highway any of the utilities hereinbefore set forth. Nothing herein restricts the action of public authorities in extraordinary emergencies. Nothing in this chapter contained may be construed as modifying or abridging the powers conferred upon the public service commission in title 49, the intent of this section being that the powers hereby granted to the department may be exercised only in such manner as not to conflict with valid exercise by the public service commission of the powers granted to it.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 111; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0139; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

24-01-40.
Right of way for utilities — Granted by director.

The director may grant to any person, who is a resident of this state, or to any corporation organized under the law of this state, or licensed to do business within this state, the right of way for the erection of a telephone line or electric line over or upon any state highway or structure constituting part of such highway or to lay pipes, conduits, or tunnels in, through, or over any such state highway or structure, or to erect, construct, and maintain any bridge, conduit, or other crossing in, under, or over such state highway or structure and in accordance with the rules and regulations therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 112; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0140.

Cross-References.

Compensation to county for damage to road in laying pipelines, see § 49-19-10.

Notice of change in topography of lands under or adjacent to utility lines, see § 49-20-12.1.

Permission to secure right of way, see § 49-19-09.

24-01-41.
Relocation of utility facilities.

Whenever the director determines and orders that any utility facility which now is, or hereafter may be, located in, over, along, or under the national system of interstate and defense highways, or urban extension thereof, qualifying for federal aid should be changed, removed, or relocated to accommodate the construction of a project on the national system of interstate and defense highways, including extensions thereof within urban areas, the utility owning or operating such facility shall change, relocate, or remove the same in accordance with the order of the director; provided that the costs of the change, relocation, or removal, including the costs of installing such facilities in a new location, must be ascertained and paid to the affected utility by the state out of state highway funds as part of the cost of such federally aided project, unless such payment would violate a legal contract between the utility and the state.

As used in this section, the term “utility” includes all cooperatively, municipally, publicly, or privately owned utilities, for supplying water, sewer, light, gas, power, telegraph, telephone, transit, pipeline, or like service to the public or any part thereof. “Cost of change, relocation, or removal” includes the entire cost incurred by such utility properly attributable to such change, relocation, or removal after deducting therefrom any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility.

The department, in cooperation with utilities, shall develop or adopt procedures for administration of utility facility relocation. The procedures must comply with federal law. At a minimum, the procedures must address notification, coordination, billing, and payment. The department shall coordinate with utilities that are affected by the construction project as early as possible in the project development process.

The department shall coordinate utility facility relocations with the affected utility in an effort to minimize cost associated with utility facility relocations.

When a utility facility needs to be relocated, the department shall enter an agreement with the utility indicating if the utility facility relocation work is eligible for reimbursement, the estimated cost for the work, the anticipated construction schedule, and the location of the work.

This section does not affect in any way the right of any utility to receive just compensation for the expense of changing, removing, or relocating its facilities located in a private right of way.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 195, §§ 1 to 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0141; 2009, ch. 230, § 1.

24-01-41.1.
Relocation of property other than utilities.

The legislative assembly assents that highway relocation assistance payments, as provided in the Federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 [Pub. L. 91-646; 84 Stat. 1894; 42 U.S.C. 4601 et seq.], and such changes or amendments thereof which Congress may hereafter enact, are to be considered a necessary cost in the construction or reconstruction of public highways which are eligible for federal aid funds. The director is authorized and empowered to expend highway funds for the cost of the state’s participation in highway relocation assistance payments. Relocation assistance payments as provided in the Federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, and such changes or amendments thereof which Congress may hereafter enact, may not be construed as creating any element of damages recognized in eminent domain.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 261, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 38.

24-01-41.2.
Relocation of utility facilities — Political subdivision roads.

Whenever a political subdivision determines and orders that any utility facility that is or may be located in, over, along, or under a road right of way under its authority, qualifying for federal aid, should be changed, removed, or relocated to accommodate the construction of a project, the utility owning or operating the facility shall change, relocate, or remove the utility facility in accordance with the order of the political subdivision; provided that the costs of the change, relocation, or removal, including the cost of installing the facilities in a new location, must be ascertained and paid to the affected utility by the political subdivision as part of the cost of the federally aided project unless the payment would violate a legal contract between the utility and the political subdivision or where the roadway existed before the utility facility.

As used in this section:

“Cost of change, relocation, or removal” includes the entire cost incurred by such utility properly attributable to such change, relocation, or removal after deducting therefrom any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility.

“Political subdivision” includes a county, city and county, city, home rule city, service authority, school district, local improvement district, law enforcement authority, water, sanitation, fire protection, metropolitan, irrigation, drainage, or other special district, or any other municipal, quasi-municipal, or public organization.

“Utility” includes all cooperatively, municipally, publicly, or privately owned utilities for supplying water, sewer, light, gas, power, telegraph, telephone, transit, pipeline, or like service to the public.

The political subdivision, in cooperation with utilities, shall develop or adopt procedures for administration of utility facility relocation. The procedures must comply with federal law. At a minimum, the procedures must address notification, coordination, billing, and payment. The political subdivision shall coordinate with utilities that are affected by the construction project as early as possible in the project development process.

The political subdivision shall coordinate utility facility relocations with the affected utility in an effort to minimize costs associated with utility facility relocations.

When a utility facility needs to be relocated, the political subdivision shall enter an agreement with the utility indicating if the utility facility relocation work is eligible for reimbursement, the estimated cost for the work, the anticipated construction schedule, and the location of the work.

This section does not affect in any way the right of any utility to receive just compensation for the expense of changing, removing, or relocating its facilities located in a private right of way.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 230, § 2.

24-01-42.
Construction of utility facility — Limitation.

No person, firm, or association may construct any electrical supply or communication line, gas, oil, or water, or other pipeline parallel to and within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] of the centerline of any state highway right of way or within seventy-five feet [22.86 meters] of the centerline of any county highway right of way without first obtaining the consent of the director or board of county commissioners except that such prohibition does not apply to highways or streets located within areas platted as townsites or additions and subdivisions thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 222, § 1; 1963, ch. 213, § 1.

24-01-43.
Utility facility — Removal.

Any utility or transmission line hereinafter constructed contrary to the provisions of section 24-01-42 must be removed at the expense of the utility, when such removal is required for purposes of highway expansion.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 222, § 2.

24-01-44.
Utility facility — Right of way for relocation.

Whenever highway improvements require the relocation of utility facilities, and it is deemed to be in the best interest of the state, the director or the board of county commissioners may acquire such right of way as may be required for such relocation, in the manner they are authorized by law to acquire highway right of way.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 222, § 3.

24-01-45.
Controlled-access facility — Commercial establishments prohibited.

No automotive service station or other commercial establishment for serving motor vehicle users may be constructed or located within the right of way of, or on publicly owned or publicly leased land acquired or used for or in connection with, a controlled-access facility.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 221, § 1.

24-01-46.
Clearing record title of right of way.

Any political subdivision, department, or agency of the state, holding an interest of record in any part of the right of way for any highway on the state highway system, shall upon application of the director, cause such interest to be conveyed to the state of North Dakota for the use and benefit of the department of transportation and no consideration for such conveyance may be required. This section may not be construed to require that lands or interest therein held by political subdivisions, departments, or agencies of the state, for other than highway purposes, be conveyed to the state without full consideration.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 226, § 1.

24-01-47.
Legislative intent — Access routes.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the director have sufficiently broad authority to provide, within means available, and with cooperation from political subdivisions, for an integrated highway system, including reasonable access from the interstate highways to the municipalities most directly affected by the construction of such highway.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 235, § 1.

Cross-References.

Integrated highway system, declaration of legislative intent, see § 39-01-01.1.

24-01-48.
Access routes to controlled-access facility.

Whenever the construction of an interstate, controlled-access highway, results in the removal from the state highway system, a highway which passes through or approaches within one mile [1.61 kilometers] of any incorporated municipality, the director may if conditions warrant, expend state highway funds to the extent of not over twenty-five percent of the cost to construct access routes on the federal aid secondary county system. Only such access routes may be constructed as are not over three miles [4.83 kilometers] in length and are necessary to provide as good or better access from such municipalities to the network of the state highway system, as existed prior to the construction of such interstate highway.

Such access routes may be constructed from the municipal limits to the interstate highway or in such other locations as will, in the opinion of the director, comply with the intent of the provisions of sections 24-01-47 and 24-01-48.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 235, § 2.

24-01-49.
Approach or escape road to be built at all dead end roads or intersections of county and state highways.

Whenever any highway on the state or county highway system has an intersection or dead end, there must be constructed, whenever feasible, an approach or escape road, and when not feasible, other protective devices such as warning signs, rumble strips, or barricades. This section applies to new road construction and reconstruction after July 1, 1975.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 237, § 1.

24-01-50.
No-mow transfer to interstate highways.

The department, in consultation with the game and fish department, shall negotiate with the United States fish and wildlife service and any other appropriate federal agency for the purposes of substituting the no-mow acres contained in the rights of way of United States highway 2 and United States highway 83 to the rights of way of interstate highway 94 or interstate highway 29, or both.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 236, § 1.

24-01-51.
Haying of no-mow areas.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person owning land adjacent to an area within the right of way of a highway which is designated as a no-mow or managed-mow area may hay the no-mow or managed-mow area after July fifteenth without any payment or penalty.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 251, § 1; 2003, ch. 12, § 3; 2005, ch. 40, § 7.

24-01-52.
Multilane highway for United States highway 52.

The director of the department of transportation shall include, as part of the department’s project development process, a four-lane alternate when it develops the environmental document for the next major reconstruction project for United States highway 52 from reference point 52-101.683 to reference point 52-122.789. It is recommended that the four-lane alternative be selected as the preferred alternate and be constructed if environmental clearance is obtained.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 251, § 1.

24-01-53.
Cost recovery for relocation of utility facilities due to implementation of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2009, ch. 231, § 2.

24-01-54.
Theodore Roosevelt expressway — United States highway 85.

Notwithstanding any previous designation, the department shall designate United States highway 85 from the South Dakota border to the junction of United States highway 2 and United States highway 2 from the Montana border to the junction of United States highway 85 as the Theodore Roosevelt expressway and at a minimum shall place signs along the highway designating that name and may use any appropriate signs donated to the department.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 40, § 14.

24-01-55.
Yellowstone trail — United States highway 12.

The department shall designate United States highway 12 from the South Dakota border to the Montana border as the Yellowstone trail and at a minimum shall place signs along the highway designating that name and may use appropriate signs donated to the department.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 220, § 1.

24-01-56.
Veterans memorial highway — State highway 22 — Continuing appropriation.

The department shall designate state highway 22 from the South Dakota border to the junction of state highway 22 and state highway 23 as the veterans memorial highway and shall place signs along the highway designating that name. The department may accept any appropriate signs or funds donated to the department for the placement of signs. Any donated funds are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing signs designating state highway 22 as the veterans memorial highway.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 223, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

24-01-57.
Akicita (veteran) memorial highway — State highway 57 — Continuing appropriation.

The department shall designate state highway 57 from the junction of United States highway 281 and state highway 57 to the junction of state highway 57 and state highway 20 as the Akicita (veteran) memorial highway and shall place signs along the highway designating that name. The department may accept any appropriate signs or funds donated to the department for the placement of signs. Any donated funds are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing signs designating state highway 57 as the Akicita (veteran) memorial highway.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 214, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.